Utah statutes.
10-1-310.   Existing energy franchise taxes or contractual franchise fees.
(1)  Except as authorized in Subsection (2), Section 59-12-203, or Section
10-1-304, a municipality may not:
(a)  impose on, charge, or collect a franchise tax or contractual a franchise
fee from an energy supplier; or
(b)  collect a franchise tax or contractual franchise fee pursuant to a
franchise agreement in effect on July 1, 1997.
(2)  A municipality that collects a contractual franchise fee from an energy
supplier pursuant to a franchise agreement in effect on July 1, 1997, may
continue to collect that fee at the same rate for the remaining term of the
franchise agreement, except the municipality shall provide a credit against
the municipal energy sales and use tax in the amount of the contractual
franchise fee paid by the energy supplier pursuant to Subsection 10-1-305(5).
(3) (a)  Subject to the requirements of Subsection (3)(b), a franchise
agreement as defined in Subsection 10-1-303(6) between a municipality and an
energy supplier may contain a provision that:
(i)  requires the energy supplier by agreement to pay a contractual franchise
fee that is otherwise prohibited under Title 10, Chapter 1, Part 3, Municipal
Energy Sales and Use Tax Act; and
(ii)  imposes the contractual franchise fee on or after the day on which Title
10, Chapter 1, Part 3, Municipal Energy Sales and Use Tax Act is:
(A)  repealed, invalidated, or the maximum allowable rate provided in Section
10-1-304 is reduced; and
(B)  is not superseded by a law imposing a substantially equivalent tax.
(b)  A municipality may not charge a contractual franchise fee under the
provisions permitted by Subsection (3)(a) unless the municipality charges an
equal contractual franchise fee or a tax on all energy suppliers.
(4)  This section may not affect the validity of any existing or future
franchise agreement and any franchise agreement effective on July 1, 1997,
shall remain in full force and effect, unless otherwise terminated or altered
by agreement or applicable law.
